Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle D. Officers.

§79-4-8.40.
Required offices.

A corporation has the offices described in its bylaws or designated by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

The board of directors may elect individuals to fill one or more offices of the corporation. A duly authorized officer may appoint one or more officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The bylaws or the board of directors shall delegate to one (1) of the officers responsibility for preparing minutes of the directors’ and shareholders’ meetings and for maintaining and authenticating records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one (1) office in a corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.40; Laws, 1991, ch. 320 § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment, in (a), substituted “offices” for “officers” and “designated” for “appointed”; in (b), added the first sentence, substituted “authorized officer” for “appointed officer,” and deleted “or assistant officers”; and in (c), inserted “maintaining and” preceding “authenticating.”

Definition of “secretary” see § 79-4-1.40.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-271 through 79-11-279.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1166-1169.

6 & 6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:61, 74:976, 74:1062.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 796, 838-844.

§79-4-8.41.
Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the duties of other officers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.41, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-271 through 79-11-279.

A corporate officer’s duties of care and loyalty extend to pledgees of corporate shares as well as to shareholders. Gibson v. Manuel, 534 So. 2d 199, 1988 Miss. LEXIS 543 (Miss. 1988).

Power of president of corporation to have litigation instituted by it where board of directors has failed or refused to grant permission.
10 A.L.R.2d 701.

Purchase of claims against corporation by officer or director thereof.
13 A.L.R.2d 1172.

Purposes for which stockholder or officer may exercise right to examine corporate books and records. 15 A.L.R.2d 11.

Estoppel of stockholder to recover back or to secure restoration of compensation of corporate officers claimed to be exorbitant or unauthorized.
16 A.L.R.2d 467.

Right of corporate officer to purchase corporate assets from corporation.
24 A.L.R.2d 71.

Power of corporate officer to hire employees for life. 28 A.L.R.2d 929.

Validity of contract between corporations as affected by directors or officers in common.
33 A.L.R.2d 1060.

Authority of officer or agent to bind corporation as guarantor or surety. 34 A.L.R.2d 290.

Authority of agent to indorse and transfer commercial paper. 37 A.L.R.2d 453.

Construction of “net profits,” “earnings,” or the like, in provision for profit-sharing bonus for corporate officers or employees. 49 A.L.R.2d 1129.

Power of particular officer or agent of business corporation to bind it by a donation to a charity or similar institution.
50 A.L.R.2d 447.

Authority of president to subordinate corporation’s claim, assignment, lien, or the like.
53 A.L.R.2d 1421.

Authority of corporate officers to mortgage or pledge corporate personal property.
62 A.L.R.2d 712.

Power of secretary or treasurer of corporation to institute litigation for it. 64 A.L.R.2d 900.

Power of president of corporation to commence or to carry on arbitration proceedings. 65 A.L.R.2d 1321.

Right of corporate officer to recover compensation for period between original improper discharge and subsequent legal discharge. 82 A.L.R.2d 965.

Recovery back by employer of compensation paid to employee as result of mistake or the employee’s fraud. 88 A.L.R.2d 1437.

Power and authority of president of business corporation to execute commercial paper. 96 A.L.R.2d 549.

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers, or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder.
7 A.L.R.3d 500.

Liability of corporate directors for negligence in permitting mismanagement or defalcations by officers or employees.
25 A.L.R.3d 941.

Liability of corporate directors or officers for negligence in permitting conversion of property of third persons by corporation.
29 A.L.R.3d 660.

Persons liable under statutes imposing, upon directors, officers, or trustees of a corporation, personal liability for its debts on account of their failure to file or publish reports, required by law, as to corporate matters.
39 A.L.R.3d 428.

What amounts to participation by corporate officer or agent in illegal issuance of security, in order to impose liability upon him under state securities regulations.
44 A.L.R.3d 588.

Liability of corporate officer or director for commission or compensation received from third person in connection with that person’s transaction with corporation.
47 A.L.R.3d 373.

Insurance: construction of policy or bond indemnifying directors or officers of corporation for expenses incurred in defending actions brought against them in their capacity as such. 49 A.L.R.3d 1250.

Test in stockholders’ actions as to reasonableness of compensation of corporate officers who as directors determine their own compensation.
53 A.L.R.3d 358.

Payment of premiums by corporation on corporate officer’s life insurance as affecting right to policy. 56 A.L.R.3d 1086.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 A.L.R.4th 387.

Liability of corporate director, officer, or employee for tortious interference with corporation’s contract with another.
72 A.L.R.4th 492.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1176, 1177, 1183, 1316 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1057, 74:1086 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 312 et seq.

9 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 57, Corporate Officer or Director as Alter Ego of Corporation.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 796, 807, 838 et seq.

Smith, Recognition of the fiduciary duties of corporate directors and officers defending against change of control by tender offer.
7 Miss. C. L. Rev. 117, Spring, 1987.

§79-4-8.42.
Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer, when performing in such capacity, shall act:

In good faith;

With the care that a person in a like position would reasonably exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner the officer reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging those duties an officer, who does not have knowledge that makes reliance unwarranted, is entitled to rely on:

The performance of properly delegated responsibilities by one or more employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in performing the responsibilities delegated; or

Information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, prepared or presented by one or more employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented or by legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons retained by the corporation as to matters involving skills or expertise the officer reasonably believes are matters (i) within the particular person’s professional or expert competence or (ii) as to which the particular person merits confidence.

An officer shall not be liable to the corporation or its shareholders for any decision to take or not to take action, or any failure to take any action, as an officer, if the duties of the office are performed in compliance with this section. Whether an officer who does not comply with this section shall have liability will depend in such instance on applicable law, including those principles of Section 79-4-8.31 that have relevance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.42; Laws, 1999, ch. 471, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

The 1999 amendment rewrote the section.

Indemnification of officers, see § 79-4-8.56.

Dissolution of corporation as not subjecting corporation’s directors and officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in this article, see § 79-4-14.05.

Misapplication or waste of corporate assets as ground for judicial dissolution of corporation, see § 79-4-14.30.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-271 through 79-11-279.

Bank officer and director standard of care, see § 81-5-105.

Alleged contributory negligence of other bank officers was not defense to branch bank’s loan officer’s breach of duty of care to bank. Omnibank of Mantee v. United Southern Bank, 607 So. 2d 76, 1992 Miss. LEXIS 446 (Miss. 1992).

Alleged inexperience or lack of skill and training of branch bank’s loan officer did not protect him from liability to parent for breach of fiduciary duties in making loans. Omnibank of Mantee v. United Southern Bank, 607 So. 2d 76, 1992 Miss. LEXIS 446 (Miss. 1992).

Chief operating official at branch bank who had substantial discretionary authority was “officer” of bank, although bank’s board of directors had not elected him. Omnibank of Mantee v. United Southern Bank, 607 So. 2d 76, 1992 Miss. LEXIS 446 (Miss. 1992).

Under “business judgment rule” director or officer who makes business judgment in good faith fulfills duty of care if director or officer: is not interested in subject of business judgment to extent director or officer reasonably believes to be appropriate under circumstances; and rationally believes that business judgment is in best interests of corporation. Omnibank of Mantee v. United Southern Bank, 607 So. 2d 76, 1992 Miss. LEXIS 446 (Miss. 1992).

Person charging corporate officer with breach of his or her duty of care has burden of production and persuasion on issues of breach, cause, and damage to corporation. Omnibank of Mantee v. United Southern Bank, 607 So. 2d 76, 1992 Miss. LEXIS 446 (Miss. 1992).

A corporate officer’s duties of care and loyalty extend to pledgees of corporate shares as well as to shareholders. Gibson v. Manuel, 534 So. 2d 199, 1988 Miss. LEXIS 543 (Miss. 1988).

In a close corporation where a majority stockholder stands to benefit as a controlling stockholder, the majority’s action must be “intrinsically fair” to the minority interest. Thus, stockholders in close corporations must bear towards each other the same relationship of trust and confidence which prevails in partnerships, rather than resort to statutory defenses. This does not mean that directors, executive officers and stockholders are not required to adhere to the corporate statutes; rather, blind adherence to corporate statutes may not be used to circumvent the corporation’s by-laws, charter or various agreements, such as a stock redemption agreement, because of the “intrinsically fair” standard that is now adopted. Fought v. Morris, 543 So. 2d 167, 1989 Miss. LEXIS 221 (Miss. 1989).

Duty and liability of closely held corporation, its directors, officers, or majority stockholders, in acquiring stock of minority shareholder.
7 A.L.R.3d 500.

Liability of corporate directors for negligence in permitting mismanagement or defalcation by officers or employees.
25 A.L.R.3d 941.

What amounts to participation by corporate officer or agent in illegal issuance of security, in order to impose liability upon him under state securities regulations.
44 A.L.R.3d 588.

Payment of premiums by corporation on corporate officer’s life insurance as affecting right to policy. 56 A.L.R.3d 1086.

What business opportunities are in “line of business” of corporation for purposes of determining whether a corporate opportunity was presented. 77 A.L.R.3d 961.

Duty to disclose material facts to stock purchaser. 80 A.L.R.3d 13.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity.”
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

Liability of corporate director, officer, or employee for tortious interference with corporation’s contract with another.
72 A.L.R.4th 492.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1455 et seq.

9 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 57, Corporate Officer or Director as Alter Ego of Corporation.

22 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 593, Wrongful Failure of Corporate Directors to Declare Dividend, §§ 14 et seq.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 848 et seq.

Smith, Recognition of the fiduciary duties of corporate directors and officers defending against change of control by tender offer.
7 Miss. C. L. Rev. 117, Spring, 1987.

Robertson, The Law of Corporate Governance: Coming of Age in Mississippi? 65 Miss. L. J. 477.

§79-4-8.43.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by delivering notice to the corporation. A resignation is effective when the notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective time. If a resignation is made effective at a later time and the board or the appointing officer accepts the future effective time, the board or the appointing officer may fill the pending vacancy before the effective time if the board or the appointing officer provides that the successor does not take office until the effective time.

An officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by: (i) the board of directors; (ii) the officer who appointed such officer, unless the bylaws or the board of directors provide otherwise; or (iii) any other officer if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

In this section, “appointing officer” means the officer (including any successor to that officer) who appointed the officer resigning or being removed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch 486, § 8.43; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendment substituted “time” for “date” five times in (a); in the third sentence of (a), substituted “board or the appointing officer” for “corporation” and “the board or the appointing officer” for “it”; rewrote (b); and added (c).

Officer’s contract rights-effect of officer’s removal or resignation, see § 79-4-8.44.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-271 through 79-11-279.

While a bylaw or statute may empower the board of directors to strip an officer of his title and corporate authority, it does not follow that the board is also empowered to disregard contractual obligations with impunity. Short v. Columbus Rubber & Gasket Co., 535 So. 2d 61, 1988 Miss. LEXIS 570 (Miss. 1988).

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1218, 1241 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1070, 74:1072, 74:1373.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 811-817.

Smith, Recognition of the fiduciary duties of corporate directors and officers defending against change of control by tender offer.
7 Miss. C. L. Rev. 117, Spring, 1987.

§79-4-8.44.
Contract rights of officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer’s removal does not affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.44, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Officers of corporation under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see §§ 79-11-271 through 79-11-279.

Payment of premiums by corporation on corporate officer’s life insurance as affecting right to policy. 56 A.L.R.3d 1086.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1244, 1254.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1410.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 804, 811.